Massachusetts, session 194th, S2295.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 775 of the acts of 1975 is hereby amended by striking
out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following text:
“(a) Except as otherwise provided in this act, the powers of the corporation shall be
exercised by a board of thirteen directors. The governor shall appoint four directors who shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor including: (1) one individual, from a nonprofit organization,
with expertise in environmental justice; (2) one individual, from a nonprofit organization, with
expertise in clean energy and climate policy; (3) one individual from the executive office of
energy and environmental affairs. The member cities and towns shall elect seven directors from
among their respective managers of municipal lighting and members of their municipal light
boards, who shall serve for a term of one year and until their successors are chosen and qualified.
of 3

At least three of the seven elected directors shall be members of municipal light boards. Three of
the seven elected directors shall be elected by the member cities and towns each of whom shall
have one equal vote. The remaining four of the seven elected directors shall be elected by the
member cities and towns each of whom shall have a vote which shall be given weight in the
same proportion which its annual kilowatt-hour sales as most recently reported to the department
under chapter one hundred and sixty-four of the General Laws or as otherwise determined or
estimated in accordance with the by-laws bears to the total of such sales by all member cities and
towns. Such an elected director may be removed at any time by the member cities and towns
with or without cause or for cause by the board. The member cities and towns shall elect a
successor to fill any vacancy among the elected directors for the unexpired term. No vacancy in
the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise the powers of the
board. A majority of the full membership of the board shall constitute a quorum and a majority
of such quorum shall be necessary for any action by the board. The directors shall not be entitled
to compensation for their services as such, but they shall be reimbursed for actual expenses
necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.”
SECTION 2. Section 17 of chapter 775 of the acts of 1975 is hereby amended by
inserting after “public interest” the following text:
“which, in such cases, shall include considerations of safety, security, reliability of
service, affordability, equity, greenhouse gas emissions reductions, the project’s compliance
under Massachusetts statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits as defined in section 3 of chapter
21N, and local emissions limits as defined in section 11F3/4 of chapter 25A”
of 3

SECTION 3. Section 19 of chapter 775 of the acts of 1975 is hereby amended, in
paragraph (a), by inserting after “energy” the following text:
“, and there is reasonable and available evidence suggesting that this determination is
justified.”
of 3